Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 4
Wage and Hour Regulation Generally

Subchapter 1
— General Provisions

Effective Dates.

Acts 1905, No. 49, § 4: effective on passage.

Acts 1911, No. 34, § 3: effective on passage.

11-4-101. Assignment of wages.

No assignment or order for wages to be earned in the future to secure a loan of less than two hundred dollars ($200) shall be valid against any employer of the person making the assignment or order until the assignment or order is accepted in writing by the employer and the assignment or order and the acceptance of it has been filed with the recorder of the county where the party making the assignment or order resides if a resident of this state or in the state where he or she is employed.

History.

Acts 1911, No. 34, §§ 1, 2; C. & M. Dig., §§ 7133, 7134; Pope's Dig., §§ 9119, 9120; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-316, 81-317; Acts 2013, No. 1151, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment deleted (b).

11-4-102. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning maximum hours in saw and planing mills, was repealed by Acts 2003, No. 924, § 1. The section was derived from Acts 1905, No. 49, §§ 1-3, p. 139; C. &. M. Dig., §§ 7082-7084; Pope's Dig., §§ 9064-9066; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-422 — 81-424.

11-4-103. Employment status.

For purposes of this chapter, employment status as an employee or independent contractor is determined by consideration of the twenty-factor test required by the Empower Independent Contractors Act of 2019, § 11-1-201 et seq.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 1055, § 2.

Subchapter 2
— Minimum Wage Law

Effective Dates.

Acts 1973, No. 13, § 2: Jan. 29, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the minimum wage of one dollar and twenty cents ($1.20) per hour currently provided by law is totally inadequate; that this Act increases the minimum wage to one dollar and forty cents ($1.40) and should be given effect on July 1, 1973; that if it should become necessary to extend the Regular Session of the Sixty-Ninth General Assembly to complete the business of the Session the final adjournment date might be too late for the provisions of this Act to be given effect on July 1, unless an emergency is declared; that the General Assembly finds that it is essential to the welfare of the citizens of this State that the provisions of this Act be given effect on July 1, 1973. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in effect from the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 316, § 2: Mar. 5, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the minimum wage of one dollar and forty cents ($1.40) currently provided by law is totally inadequate; and that this Act increases the minimum wage to one dollar and seventy cents ($1.70) and should be given effect on July 1, 1975; and that if it should become necessary to extend the Regular Session of the Seventieth General Assembly to complete the business of the Session, the final adjournment date might be too late for the provisions of this Act to be given effect on July 1, 1975, unless an emergency is declared; that the General Assembly finds that it is essential to the welfare of the citizens of this State that the provisions of this Act be given effect on July 1, 1975. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1156, § 2: Feb. 11, 1976. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventieth General Assembly, meeting in Extended Session, that Section 1 of Act 316 of 1975 requires clarification regarding the status of students under Arkansas Labor Laws and the effect of gratuities upon minimum wage, and that legislative action is necessary to allow this clarification. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1977, No. 345, § 6: Mar. 1, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the minimum wage of two dollars ($2.00) per hour currently provided by law is totally inadequate; that this Act increases the minimum wage to two dollars and ten cents ($2.10) an hour; that the minimum wage coverage extending to employers with five (5) or more employees is totally inadequate; that this Act extends the minimum wage coverage to employers with four (4) or more employees; that employment of workers in excess of forty (40) hours in a workweek, and forty-eight (48) hours in a workweek in the case of hotel, motel, and restaurant workers, at less than premium pay for such additional work is detrimental to the health and welfare of such workers; that this Act provides overtime compensation for hours worked in excess of forty (40) hours in a workweek, and forty-eight (48) hours per workweek in the case of hotel, motel, and restaurant workers, at one and one-half times their regular hourly rate of pay; that the General Assembly finds that it is essential to the welfare of the citizens of this State that the provisions of this Act be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in effect from the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 610, § 3: Jan. 1, 1982.

Acts 1981, No. 667, § 3: Jan. 1, 1982.

Acts 1987, No. 987, § 3: Apr. 14, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that because of the case Ricarte v. State, CR 86-31, a question has arisen over the validity of Act 1156 of the Extended Session of 1976; that this Act is a reenactment of the former law; and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to clarify the state of the law on this issue. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 544, § 6: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the minimum wage laws and overtime laws in Arkansas are in need of revision and that this act is immediately necessary to assist persons now receiving minimum wage. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1997, No. 201, § 5: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the state minimum wage in Arkansas is unreasonably low; that this act increases the state minimum wage to parallel the federal minimum wage; that this act should go into effect on July 1, 1997; and that unless this emergency clause is adopted the act will not be effective until after July 1, 1997. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect beginning July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1997, No. 221, § 6: Feb. 20, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present law regarding the enforcement by the Director of the Department of Labor of the state's minimum wage laws is both time consuming and costly, resulting in unnecessary delay in recovery of wages for wage earners and unnecessary costs to the state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 1369, § 5: Apr. 12, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly, that those camps affected by this Act are in immediate need of relief so that they may plan and continue their operations. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Identical Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 15 and 16, § 8: Oct. 1, 2006.

Acts 2007, No. 545, § 3: Mar. 28, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that Act 15 of the 1st Extraordinary Session of 2006 raised the state minimum wage and enlarged its application. It is further found that there is a need to parallel certain provisions of federal labor law in order to prevent widespread disruption of the payroll practices of Arkansas employers that would result in increased business costs. It is further found that those increased business costs would place Arkansas employers in a competitive disadvantage by comparison to employers in other states and would result in irreparable economic harm Arkansas employers and their employees. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2007, No. 707, § 2: Apr. 29, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act is necessary to protect jobs within the State of Arkansas, prevent an increase in costs to residents and tourists that patronize restaurants, and protect the financial stability of businesses that rely on the services provided by tipped employees. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective thirty (30) days from and after the date of its passage and approval. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective thirty (30) days from the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective thirty (30) days from the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 457, § 2: Mar. 21, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that organized camps and religious and nonprofit educational conference centers begin preparations for summer camps and conferences several months before the summer season begins; that organized camps and religious and nonprofit educational conference centers need clarity about staff wages early in the season-preparation and planning process; and that this act is immediately necessary because organized camps and religious and nonprofit educational conference centers will be harmed if they cannot immediately construct an accurate picture of the costs of operating during the forthcoming summer season. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2017, No. 914, § 5: Apr. 5, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that a recent 4 to 3 decision by the Supreme Court in Gerber Products Company v. Hewitt, 2016 Ark. 222, 492 S.W.3d 856, is at odds with the intent of the General Assembly because it misinterpreted state law, as evidenced by the legislative history surrounding the Minimum Wage Act of the State of Arkansas, § 11-4-201 et seq., to require compensation for certain activities otherwise made noncompensable through the collective bargaining process; that the dissenting opinion in Gerber Products Company v. Hewitt better reflects the legislative intent of the General Assembly and identifies some of the dangers presented by the majority opinion, specifically that ‘the floodgates will open to litigation at the enormous cost to businesses in Arkansas’ and that the opinion ‘undermines the collective-bargaining process and destroys any confidence employers and employees have in the enforceability of their agreements’; that certain activities have not been considered to be ‘work’ under state or federal law by employers and employees in the State of Arkansas who have conducted business in reliance upon that accepted understanding; that federal law embodied in the Fair Labor Standards Act, 29 U.S.C. § 201 et seq., along with regulations and case law interpreting the same, has for many decades established that these certain activities are not compensable ‘work’; that the Minimum Wage Act of the State of Arkansas, § 11-4-201 et seq., existed for nearly fifty years without any interpretation that such activities should be compensable ‘work’ under any state law; and that this act is immediately necessary to legislatively overrule Gerber Products Company v. Hewitt, to clarify that the Minimum Wage Act of the State of Arkansas, § 11-4-201 et seq., incorporates and has always relied upon 29 U.S.C. § 254, which is now embodied in § 11-4-221, to define whether certain activities constitute compensable ‘work’ under state law, and to clarify the Minimum Wage Act of the State of Arkansas's deference to collective bargaining as embodied in § 11-4-205, so as to (1) protect the sanctity of collective bargaining agreements that have been negotiated and honored so as not to require compensation for activities like those described in 29 U.S.C. § 203(o) of the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, and (2) protect Arkansas employers from increased business costs that would place them in a competitive disadvantage by comparison to employers in other states and that would result in irreparable economic harm to such Arkansas employers and their employees. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

11-4-201. Title.

This subchapter shall be known as the “Minimum Wage Act of the State of Arkansas”.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 25, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-318.

11-4-202. Policy.

It is declared to be the public policy of the State of Arkansas to establish minimum wages for workers in order to safeguard their health, efficiency, and general well-being and to protect them as well as their employers from the effects of serious and unfair competition resulting from wage levels detrimental to their health, efficiency, and well-being.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 25, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-319.

11-4-203. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

[Repealed.]

“Employ” means to suffer or to permit to work;

“Employee” means any individual employed by an employer but shall not include:

Any individual employed in a bona fide executive, administrative, or professional capacity or as an outside commission-paid salesperson who customarily performs his or her services away from his or her employer's premises taking orders for goods or services;

Any student performing services for any school, college, or university in which he or she is enrolled and is regularly attending classes;

Any individual employed by the United States;

Any individual engaged in the activities of any educational, charitable, religious, or nonprofit organization in which the employer-employee relationship does not in fact exist or in which the services are rendered to the organizations gratuitously;

Any bona fide independent contractor;

Any individual employed by an agricultural employer who did not use more than five hundred (500) man-days of agricultural labor in any calendar quarter of the preceding calendar year;

The parent, spouse, child, or other member of an agricultural employer's immediate family;

An individual who:

Is employed as a hand-harvest laborer and is paid on a piece-rate basis in an operation that has been, and is customarily and generally recognized as having been, paid on a piece-rate basis in the region of employment;

Commutes daily from his or her permanent residence to the farm on which he or she is so employed; and

Has been employed in agriculture less than thirteen (13) weeks during the preceding calendar year;

A migrant who:

Is sixteen (16) years of age or under and is employed as a hand-harvest laborer;

Is paid on a piece-rate basis in an operation that has been, and is customarily and generally recognized as having been, paid on a piece-rate basis in the region of employment;

Is employed on the same farm as his or her parents; and

Is paid the same piece-rate as employees over sixteen (16) years of age are paid on the same farm;

Any employee principally engaged in the range production of livestock;

Any employee employed in planting or tending trees, cruising, surveying, or felling timber or in preparing or transporting logs or other forestry products to the mill, processing plants, or railroad or other transportation terminal if the number of employees employed by his or her employer in the forestry or lumbering operations does not exceed eight (8);

An employee employed by a nonprofit recreational or educational camp that does not operate for more than seven (7) months in any calendar year;

A nonprofit child welfare agency employee who serves as a houseparent who is:

Directly involved in caring for children who reside in residential facilities of the nonprofit child welfare agency and who are orphans, in foster care, abused, neglected, abandoned, homeless, in need of supervision, or otherwise in crisis situations that lead to out-of-home placements; and

Compensated at an annual rate of not less than thirteen thousand dollars ($13,000) or compensated at an annual rate of not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) if the employee resides in the residential facility and receives board and lodging at no cost;

An employee employed in connection with the publication of a weekly, semiweekly, or daily newspaper with a circulation:

Of less than four thousand (4,000); and

The major part of which is within the county in which the newspaper is published or counties contiguous to the county in which the newspaper is published;

An employee employed on a casual basis in domestic service employment to provide:

Babysitting services; or

Companionship services for individuals who are unable to care for themselves because of age or infirmity;

An employee engaged in the delivery of newspapers to retail subscribers;

A home worker engaged in:

Making wreaths composed principally of natural holly, pine, cedar, or other evergreens; and

Harvesting natural holly, pine, cedar, and other evergreens used in making such wreaths; or

An individual employed by an establishment that is an organized camp or a religious or nonprofit educational conference center if:

The organized camp or a religious or nonprofit educational conference center does not operate for more than seven (7) months in a calendar year; or

During the preceding calendar year, the average receipts of the organized camp or a religious or nonprofit educational conference center for any six (6) months of the preceding calendar year were not more than thirty-three and one-third percent (33 1/3%) of the average receipts of the organized camp or a religious or nonprofit educational conference center for the other six (6) months of the preceding calendar year.

This subdivision (3)(R) is effective retroactively as of January 1, 2006.

The retroactive effect of this subdivision (3)(R) does not impose liability on the Division of Labor or on an employee to repay damages, back wages, civil money penalties, or other moneys collected or paid by the division or received by an employee;

“Employer” means any individual, partnership, association, corporation, business trust, the State of Arkansas, any political subdivision of the state, or any person or group of persons acting directly or indirectly in the interest of an employer in relation to an employee.

“Employer” shall not include any individual, partnership, association, corporation, business trust, or any person or group of persons acting directly or indirectly in the interest of an employer in relation to an employee for any work week in which fewer than four (4) employees are employed;

“Gratuities” means voluntary monetary contributions received by an employee from a guest, patron, or customer for services rendered;

“Independent contractor” means any individual who contracts to perform certain work away from the premises of his or her employer, uses his or her own methods to accomplish the work, and is subject to the control of the employer only as to the result of his or her work;

“Man-day” means any day during any portion of which an employee performs any agricultural labor. Any individual otherwise excluded as an employee under subdivision (3)(I) of this section shall be considered an employee in computing man-days of agricultural labor;

“Occupation” means any occupation, service, trade, business, industry, or branch or group of industries or employment or class of employment in which employees are gainfully employed; and

“Wage” means compensation due to an employee by reason of his or her employment, payable in legal tender of the United States or checks on banks convertible into cash on demand at full face value, subject to such deductions, charges, or allowances as may be permitted by this subchapter or by rules of the Director of the Division of Labor under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 25, § 2; 1977, No. 345, § 1; 1979, No. 1095, § 1; 1983, No. 698, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-320; Acts 1989, No. 360, § 1; 1999, No. 1369, § 1; 2001, No. 1423, § 1; 2003, No. 212, § 1; Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 15, § 1; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 16, § 1; 2007, No. 545, § 1; 2013, No. 457, § 1; 2013, No. 1128, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 755; 2019, No. 910, §§
5307, 5308.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment by No. 457 added (3)(R).

The 2013 amendment by No. 1128, in (3)(B), substituted “Any student” for “Students,” “he or she is” for “they are,” and “is” for “are.”

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (9).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 repealed (1); and, in (3)(R)(ii)

(b)

, substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor” and “division” for “department”.

Effective Dates.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 15 and 16, § 8, provide: “This act shall become effective on October 1, 2006.”

11-4-204. [Repealed.]

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The repeal of this section by Acts 2019, No. 853, § 1, superseded the amendment of this section by Acts 2019, No. 315, § 756. The amendment by Act 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” twice in subsection (a).

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning the liberal construction of laws in this subchapter, was repealed by Acts 2019, No. 853, § 1, effective July 24, 2019. The section was derived from Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 25, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 81–331; Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 15, § 2; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 16, § 2; 2019, No. 315, §
756.

11-4-205. Right of collective bargaining not affected.

Nothing in this subchapter, including the provisions of § 11-4-218(b), shall be deemed to interfere with, impede, or in any way diminish the right of employers and employees to bargain collectively through representatives of their own choosing in order to establish wages or other conditions of work.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 25, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-332; Acts 2017, No. 914, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2017, No. 914, § 1, provided: “Purpose.

The purpose of this act is to resolve questions that have arisen regarding:

“(1)

The proper interpretation of § 11-4-205 and § 11-4-218(b); and

“(2)

What activities constitute ‘work’ under the Minimum Wage Act of the State of Arkansas, § 11-4-201 et seq., as interpreted by the Supreme Court in Gerber Products Company v. Hewitt, 2016 Ark. 222, 492 S.W.3d 856.”

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment inserted “including the provisions of §
11-4-218(b)”.

11-4-206. Penalties.

Any employer who willfully hinders or delays the Director of the Division of Labor or his or her authorized representative in the performance of his or her duties in the enforcement of this subchapter, willfully refuses to admit the director or his or her authorized representative to any place of employment, willfully fails to make, keep, and preserve any records as required under the provisions of this subchapter, willfully falsifies any such record, willfully refuses to make the record accessible to the director or his or her authorized representative upon demand, willfully refuses to furnish a sworn statement of the record or any other information required for the proper enforcement of this subchapter to the director or his or her authorized representative upon demand, willfully fails to post a summary of this subchapter or a copy of any applicable rules as required by § 11-4-216, pays or agrees to pay minimum wages at a rate less than the rate applicable under this subchapter, or otherwise willfully violates any provision of this subchapter or of any rule issued under this subchapter shall be deemed in violation of this subchapter and shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation.

For the purposes of this subsection, each violation shall constitute a separate offense.

Any employer who willfully discharges or in any other manner willfully discriminates against any employee because the employee has made any complaint to his or her employer or to the director or his or her authorized representative that he or she has not been paid minimum wages in accordance with the provisions of this subchapter or because the employee has caused to be instituted or is about to cause to be instituted any proceeding under or related to this subchapter or because the employee has testified or is about to testify in any such proceeding shall be deemed in violation of this subchapter and shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation.

For the purposes of this section, each day that the violation continues shall constitute a separate offense.

The director shall determine the amount of the penalty and shall consider the appropriateness of the penalty to the size of the business and the gravity of the violation.

The determination by the director shall be final unless within fifteen (15) days after receipt of notice thereof by certified mail the person, firm, corporation, partnership, or association charged with the violation notifies the director in writing that he or she contests the proposed penalty. In the event that a penalty is contested, a final determination shall be made pursuant to the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.

Upon a final administrative determination, the amount of the penalty may be recovered in a civil action brought by the director in a court of competent jurisdiction without paying costs or giving bond for costs.

Sums collected under this section shall be paid into the Department of Labor and Licensing Special Fund.

Assessment of a civil penalty by the director shall be made no later than three (3) years after the date of the occurrence of the violation.

In addition to the civil penalty provided by this section, the director is authorized to petition any court of competent jurisdiction, without paying costs or giving bond for costs, to enjoin or restrain any person, firm, corporation, partnership, or association who violates the provisions of this subchapter or any rule issued thereunder.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 25, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-329; Acts 2001, No. 1423, § 2; 2019, No. 315, § 757; 2019, No. 910, §§
5309, 5310.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” and “rule” for “regulation” in (a)(1).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (a)(1); and substituted “Department of Labor and Licensing Special Fund” for “Department of Labor Special Fund” in (g).

11-4-207. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning the creation of the Labor Board, was repealed by Acts 2001, No. 1423, § 3. The section was derived from Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 25, § 5; 1979, No. 996, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-323; Acts 1997, No. 250, § 58.

11-4-208. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning the authority of the Labor Board, was repealed by Acts 2001, No. 1423, § 4. The section was derived from Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 25, § 5; 1979, No. 996, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-323.

11-4-209. Director of the Division of Labor — Powers and duties.

For any occupation, the Director of the Division of Labor shall make and revise such administrative rules, including definitions of terms, as he or she may deem appropriate to carry out the purposes of this subchapter or necessary to prevent the circumvention or evasion thereof and to safeguard the minimum wage rates established.

The rules may include, but are not limited to, rules governing:

Outside or commission salespersons;

Learners and apprentices, their number, proportion, and length of service;

Part-time pay, bonuses, and fringe benefits;

Special pay for special or extra work;

Permitted charges to employees or allowances for board, lodging, apparel, or other facilities or services customarily furnished by employers to employees;

Allowances for gratuities; and

Allowances for other special conditions or circumstances which may be usual in a particular employer-employee relationship.

Rules shall be promulgated pursuant to the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.

The director or his or her authorized representatives shall:

Have authority to enter and inspect the place of business or employment of any employer in the state for the purpose of:

Examining and inspecting any or all books, registers, payrolls, and other records of any employer that in any way relate to or have a bearing upon the question of wages, hours, and other conditions of employment of any employees;

Copying any or all of the books, registers, payrolls, and other records as he or she may deem necessary or appropriate; and

Questioning employees for the purpose of ascertaining whether the provisions of this subchapter and rules issued under this subchapter have been and are being complied with;

Have authority to require from the employer full and correct statements in writing, including sworn statements, with respect to wages, hours, names, addresses, and such information pertaining to his or her employees as the director or his or her authorized representative may deem necessary or appropriate;

Publish all rules promulgated pursuant to this subchapter; and

Otherwise implement and enforce the provisions of this subchapter and the rules issued under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 25, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-322; Acts 2001, No. 1423, § 5; 2019, No. 315, §§ 758-760; 2019, No. 910, § 5311.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” throughout the section.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (a).

11-4-210. Minimum wage.

Beginning October 1, 2006, every employer shall pay each of his or her employees wages at the rate of not less than six dollars and twenty-five cents ($6.25) per hour except as otherwise provided in this subchapter.

Beginning January 1, 2015, every employer shall pay each of his or her employees wages at the rate of not less than seven dollars and fifty cents ($7.50) per hour, beginning January 1, 2016, the rate of not less than eight dollars ($8.00) per hour, and beginning January 1, 2017, the rate of not less than eight dollars and fifty cents ($8.50) per hour, except as otherwise provided in this subchapter.

Beginning January 1, 2019, every employer shall pay each of his or her employees wages at the rate of not less than nine dollars and twenty-five cents ($9.25) per hour, beginning January 1, 2020 the rate of not less than ten dollars ($10.00) per hour and beginning January 1, 2021 the rate of not less than eleven dollars ($11.00) per hour except as otherwise provided in this subchapter.

With respect to any full-time student attending any accredited institution of education within this state and who is employed to work an amount not to exceed twenty (20) hours during weeks that school is in session or forty (40) hours during weeks when school is not in session, the rate of wage shall be equal to but not less than eighty-five percent (85%) of the minimum wage provided in this section.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 25, § 3; 1973, No. 13, § 1; 1975, No. 316, § 1; 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1156, § 1; 1977, No. 345, §§ 2, 3; 1979, No. 996, § 3; 1981, No. 610, § 1; 1981, No. 667, § 1; 1983, No. 453, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-321; Acts 1987, No. 974, § 1; reen. Acts 1987, No. 987, § 1; Acts 1989, No. 360, § 2; 1989, No. 845, § 1; 1991, No. 544, § 1; 1993, No. 331, § 1; 1993, No. 568, § 1; 1997, No. 201, § 1; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 15, § 3; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 16, § 3; Init. Meas. 2014, No. 1, § 1; Init. Meas. 2018, No. 5, §
1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

This section was reenacted by Acts 1987, No. 987, § 1. Acts 1987, No. 834, provided that 1987 legislation reenacting acts passed in the 1976 Extended Session should not repeal any other 1987 legislation and that such other legislation would be controlling in the event of conflict.

Acts 1989, No. 360, § 2, also included at the beginning of (a)(1) the following language: “Beginning January 1, 1989.”

As enacted, the 1991 amendment in (a)(1) began “Beginning July 1, 1991.”

Publisher's Notes.

The 2018 amendment was proposed by petition of the people and approved at the November 6, 2018 general election by a vote of 603,346 for and 278,164 against.

Amendments.

The 2014 amendment added (a)(2).

The 2018 amendment added (a)(3).

Effective Dates.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 15 and 16, § 8, provide: “This act shall become effective on October 1, 2006.”

Init. Meas. 2018, No. 5, §
1: Dec. 6, 2018.